fst/verbs.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+V
! Person
+1p
+2p
+3p

! Gender
+Masc
+Fem

!Number
+Sg
+Pl

+CausI		! Causative (study+CausI -> teach x)
+CausII		! Extended causative (studt+CausII -> make x learn 

! Tense
+Pres
+Fut
+Past

! Aspect
+Hab		! Habitual
+Prog		! Progressive
+Perf		! Perfective

! Mood
+Imp		! Imperative
+Sub		! Subjunctive

! Relation
+Int		! Intimate
+Fam		! Familiar
+Pol		! Polite
^GuessVerb
	
LEXICON Verb
! Stem
+V:0 #;

! Habitual
+V+Hab:0 Habitual;

! Perfective
+V+Perf:0 Perfective;

! Infinitive
+V+Inf:^ना #;
+N+Obl:^ने #;

! Imperative
+V+Imp:0 Imperative;

! Subjunctive
+V+Sub:0 Subjunctive;

! Future
+V:0 Future;

LEXICON Subjunctive
+1p+Sg:^ऊँ #;
+1p+Pl:^एँ #;
+2p+Sg+Fam:^ए #;
+2p+Sg+Pol:^एँ #;
+2p+Pl+Fam:^ओ #;
+2p+Pl+Pol:^एँ #;
+3p+Sg:^ए #;
+3p+Pl:^एँ #;

LEXICON Imperative
+Int:0 #;
+Fam:^ओ #;
+Pol:^इए #;
+Pol+Fut:^इएगा #;

LEXICON Habitual
+Masc+Sg:^ता #;
+Masc+Pl:^ते #;
+Fem+Sg:^ती #;
+Fem+Pl:^ती #;

LEXICON Perfective
+Masc+Sg:^आ #;
+Masc+Pl:^ए #;
+Fem+Sg:^ई #;
+Fem+Pl:^ईं #;

! LEXICON Personal
! +1p+Sg:^ऊँ ;
! +2p+Sg:^ए ;
! +3p+Sg:^ए ;
! +1p+Pl:^एँ ;
! +2p+Pl:^ओ ;
! +2p+Pl:^एँ ;
! +3p+Pl:^एँ ;

! LEXICON Adjectival
! +Masc+Sg:^आ ;
! +Masc+Pl:^ए ;
! +Fem+Sg:^ई ;
! +Fem+Pl:^ईं ;

LEXICON Future
+Fut+1p+Masc+Sg:^ऊँगा #;
+Fut+1p+Fem+Sg:^ऊँगी #;
+Fut+1p+Masc+Pl:^एँगे #;
+Fut+1p+Fem+Pl:^एँगीं #;

+Fut+2p+Masc+Sg:^एगा #;
+Fut+2p+Fem+Sg:^एगी #;
+Fut+2p+Masc+Pl:^ओगे #;
+Fut+2p+Fem+Pl:^ओगीं #;
+Fut+2p+Masc+Pl:^एँगे #;
+Fut+2p+Fem+Pl:^एँगीं #;

+Fut+3p+Masc+Sg:^एगा #;
+Fut+3p+Fem+Sg:^एगी #;
+Fut+3p+Masc+Pl:^एँगे #;
+Fut+3p+Fem+Pl:^एँगीं #;

LEXICON Root
अँकुर Verb;
अँगरा Verb;
अँचवा Verb;
अँट Verb;
अँठला Verb;
अँदा Verb;
अंकुर Verb;
अंचव Verb;
अंजोर Verb;
अंटिया Verb;
अंधेर Verb;
अकुला Verb;
अगट Verb;
अगुआ Verb;
अघवा Verb;
अचवा Verb;
अटक Verb;
अटपटा Verb;
अड़का Verb;
अतुरा Verb;
अनंग Verb;
अनगा Verb;
अनवाँस Verb;
अनुमान Verb;
अनुसंधान Verb;
अनुहार Verb;
अन्हा Verb;
अपमान Verb;
अपावर्तन Verb;
अफरा Verb;
अभिसर Verb;
अमल Verb;
अमेज Verb;
अरगा Verb;
अरद Verb;
अरम्भ Verb;
अरसना-परस Verb;
अरिया Verb;
अरेर Verb;
अर्था Verb;
अलला Verb;
अलुझ Verb;
अवगत Verb;
अवडेर Verb;
अव Verb;
अवरोह Verb;
अवलुंचन Verb;
अवलोच Verb;
अविलोक Verb;
अहक Verb;
अहार Verb;
आँच Verb;
आकर्ष Verb;
आचर Verb;
आड़ Verb;
आनन्द Verb;
आमरख Verb;
आरोग Verb;
आलिंग Verb;
आवट Verb;
आहला Verb;
इङ्ग Verb;
इठला Verb;
ईख Verb;
उँघ Verb;
उँडल Verb;
उंघ Verb;
उआ Verb;
उकठ Verb;
उकलवा Verb;
उकसा Verb;
उकिलवा Verb;
उकुस Verb;
उखड़ Verb;
उखर Verb;
उखेड़ Verb;
उगट Verb;
उगला Verb;
उगसार Verb;
उगाल Verb;
उग्रह Verb;
उघड़ Verb;
उघाड़ Verb;
उचक Verb;
उचटा Verb;
उचरवा Verb;
उचा Verb;
उचेल Verb;
उच्छल Verb;
उछल Verb;
उछार Verb;
उजड़वा Verb;
उजलवा Verb;
उजाल Verb;
उजेर Verb;
उझल Verb;
उठँग Verb;
उठ Verb;
उड़ल Verb;
उड़ा Verb;
उढ़क Verb;
उढ़ा Verb;
उतपन Verb;
उतपा Verb;
उतार Verb;
उद्धार Verb;
उधेड़ Verb;
उपजवा Verb;
उफ़न Verb;
उबल Verb;
उभड़वा Verb;
उमग Verb;
उलछ Verb;
उलीच Verb;
ऊँघ Verb;
ऊब Verb;
ओक Verb;
ओढ़वा Verb;
औंट Verb;
औट Verb;
कँधिया Verb;
कचक Verb;
कटवा Verb;
कफना Verb;
करक Verb;
कराह Verb;
कस Verb;
कहला Verb;
काछ Verb;
किकिया Verb;
किलकार Verb;
कीक Verb;
कुचला Verb;
कुदवा Verb;
कुरेल Verb;
कुहुक Verb;
कूत Verb;
कोंच Verb;
कोस Verb;
खँघार Verb;
खटखटा Verb;
खदबदा Verb;
खपा Verb;
खरीदवा Verb;
खल Verb;
खसोट Verb;
खिंच Verb;
खिचा Verb;
खिलखिला Verb;
खिसक Verb;
खीच Verb;
खुद Verb;
खुरपिआ Verb;
खुल Verb;
खेलवा Verb;
खोंस Verb;
खोदवा Verb;
खोलवा Verb;
गंवा Verb;
गड़गड़ा Verb;
गड़ो Verb;
गमक Verb;
गरमा Verb;
गर्भा Verb;
गाड़ Verb;
गिंज Verb;
गिना Verb;
गींज Verb;
गुँध Verb;
गुंथ Verb;
गुज़ार Verb;
गुथवा Verb;
गुम Verb;
गूँथ Verb;
गूंध Verb;
गोड़ा Verb;
गोलिया Verb;
घट Verb;
घबड़ा Verb;
घर्रघरा Verb;
घिर Verb;
घिसवा Verb;
घुमाना-फिरा Verb;
घुस Verb;
घूम Verb;
घेरवा Verb;
घोट Verb;
चंचना Verb;
चटक Verb;
चढ़ा Verb;
चपर Verb;
चमक Verb;
चर Verb;
चर्रा Verb;
चसक Verb;
चाक Verb;
चाल Verb;
चिखुर Verb;
चिढ़का Verb;
चिता Verb;
चिबला Verb;
चिल्लवा Verb;
चीख Verb;
चीरवा Verb;
चुकवा Verb;
चुनचुना Verb;
चुपड़ Verb;
चुभा Verb;
चुर Verb;
चुस Verb;
चूर Verb;
चौंक Verb;
छँटा Verb;
छन Verb;
छपवा Verb;
छलका Verb;
छाँट Verb;
छा Verb;
छिड़क Verb;
छितरा Verb;
छिपा Verb;
छींट Verb;
छुकछुका Verb;
छुपा Verb;
छू Verb;
छेद Verb;
छोल Verb;
जँतवा Verb;
जंता Verb;
जगमगा Verb;
जतला Verb;
जनम Verb;
जन्मा Verb;
जमुहा Verb;
जाँच Verb;
जात Verb;
जिलवा Verb;
जी Verb;
जुआठ Verb;
जुझवा Verb;
जुठाल Verb;
जुतिया Verb;
जोड़ Verb;
झँवा Verb;
झटक Verb;
झड़ Verb;
झपट Verb;
झल Verb;
झांक Verb;
झिझक Verb;
झुक Verb;
झुमवा Verb;
झुलवा Verb;
झूँम Verb;
झूलवा Verb;
झोंक Verb;
टँकवा Verb;
टंग Verb;
टघर Verb;
टटोल Verb;
टप Verb;
टरटरा Verb;
टल Verb;
टहक Verb;
टाँग Verb;
टिक Verb;
टिमटिमा Verb;
टूँग Verb;
टोक Verb;
ठँस Verb;
ठगा Verb;
ठहर Verb;
ठान Verb;
ठिनक Verb;
ठुमक Verb;
ठेंस Verb;
ठोंक Verb;
डँसवा Verb;
डगडोल Verb;
डपट Verb;
डभकवा Verb;
डरप Verb;
डल Verb;
डाँट Verb;
डाल Verb;
डुबो Verb;
डोल Verb;
ढँकवा Verb;
ढकेल Verb;
ढमढमा Verb;
ढर Verb;
ढल Verb;
ढहा Verb;
ढाक Verb;
ढाह Verb;
ढुल Verb;
ढूँढवा Verb;
तँगिया Verb;
तक Verb;
तड़क Verb;
तड़पड़ा Verb;
तड़फड़वा Verb;
तड़फा Verb;
तपा Verb;
तर Verb;
तल Verb;
ताक Verb;
ताप Verb;
तिड़क Verb;
तुड़वा Verb;
तुरप Verb;
तुल Verb;
तैर Verb;
तोड़वा Verb;
तोर Verb;
तोषणा Verb;
त्याग Verb;
थपका Verb;
थरहरा Verb;
थाह Verb;
थूक Verb;
दफ़ना Verb;
दबोच Verb;
दरर Verb;
दल Verb;
दहका Verb;
दहाड़ Verb;
दांव Verb;
दा Verb;
दिखा Verb;
दुखा Verb;
दुरदुरा Verb;
दुहरा Verb;
देखना-भाल Verb;
दोहा Verb;
दौड़ा Verb;
धकधका Verb;
धकेल Verb;
धड़का Verb;
धधका Verb;
धर Verb;
धुँआ Verb;
धुँधुआ Verb;
धुंधा Verb;
धुआँ Verb;
धुल Verb;
धो Verb;
नकार Verb;
नचा Verb;
नपवा Verb;
नवाज Verb;
नसा Verb;
नाँध Verb;
नाद Verb;
निंदा Verb;
निकाल Verb;
निचुड़ Verb;
निदर Verb;
निबह Verb;
निभा Verb;
निरा Verb;
नींद Verb;
नोच Verb;
पंज Verb;
पकड़ा Verb;
पखार Verb;
पचक Verb;
पछता Verb;
पट Verb;
पठा Verb;
पढ़वा Verb;
पतीज Verb;
पनप Verb;
परपरा Verb;
परित्याग Verb;
पलास Verb;
पसा Verb;
पहचान Verb;
पहुँचवा Verb;
पाछ Verb;
पा Verb;
पिचक Verb;
पितरा Verb;
पिरा Verb;
पिलवा Verb;
पिसा Verb;
पीट Verb;
पुकार Verb;
पुत Verb;
पुरा Verb;
पूज Verb;
पेर Verb;
पैठा Verb;
पोंछ Verb;
पोता Verb;
पौंढ़ Verb;
प्रगटा Verb;
फँस Verb;
फक Verb;
फटका Verb;
फड़फड़ा Verb;
फरमा Verb;
फला Verb;
फ़रमा Verb;
फांद Verb;
फिंका Verb;
फिलमा Verb;
फींच Verb;
फुसफुसा Verb;
फूंक Verb;
फेंक Verb;
फेकवा Verb;
फैला Verb;
बँटवा Verb;
बउरा Verb;
बख़्श Verb;
बख्शा Verb;
बचा Verb;
बजा Verb;
बड़बड़ा Verb;
बतला Verb;
बदल Verb;
बनना-ठन Verb;
बरका Verb;
बरषा Verb;
बर्गला Verb;
बसा Verb;
बह Verb;
बहवा Verb;
बाँच Verb;
बांध Verb;
बिकवा Verb;
बिखर Verb;
बिगाड़ Verb;
बिछवा Verb;
बिठा Verb;
बिदरा Verb;
बियाह Verb;
बिलगा Verb;
बिलोड़ Verb;
बीत Verb;
बुझ Verb;
बुता Verb;
बुरक Verb;
बुहार Verb;
बूड़ा Verb;
बेच Verb;
बेलवा Verb;
बैठा Verb;
बो Verb;
बोलवा Verb;
ब्या Verb;
भँगिया Verb;
भकर Verb;
भग Verb;
भज Verb;
भठिया Verb;
भड़भड़ा Verb;
भरमा Verb;
भाँप Verb;
भिंगवा Verb;
भिगवा Verb;
भिजा Verb;
भिनक Verb;
भीग Verb;
भुँजा Verb;
भुगता Verb;
भुना Verb;
भूँक Verb;
भून Verb;
भेजवा Verb;
भौंक Verb;
मँजवा Verb;
मँड़वा Verb;
मंडला Verb;
मचका Verb;
मचला Verb;
मटिआ Verb;
मढ़वा Verb;
मना Verb;
मरमरा Verb;
मलवा Verb;
महक Verb;
माँग Verb;
मांज Verb;
मार Verb;
मिटा Verb;
मींज Verb;
मुँड़ा Verb;
मुकर Verb;
मुड़ा Verb;
मुस्करा Verb;
मूँद Verb;
मूतवा Verb;
मोटा Verb;
रँग Verb;
रंग Verb;
रंभा Verb;
रखिया Verb;
रङ्गा Verb;
रटा Verb;
रस Verb;
रांध Verb;
रिर Verb;
रिसा Verb;
रुक Verb;
रुला Verb;
रेंग Verb;
रेल Verb;
रो Verb;
रौंदवा Verb;
लग Verb;
लजा Verb;
लड़खड़ा Verb;
लताड़ Verb;
लद Verb;
लपेट Verb;
ललच Verb;
लहरा Verb;
लाद Verb;
लिखा Verb;
लिपटा Verb;
लील Verb;
लुटा Verb;
लुढ़का Verb;
लेट Verb;
लेप Verb;
लौट Verb;
वसूल Verb;
विराज Verb;
विलोड़ Verb;
शराप Verb;
श्राप Verb;
सँघेर Verb;
सँवर Verb;
संजो Verb;
सक Verb;
सकुच Verb;
सज Verb;
सट Verb;
सड़ा Verb;
सनसना Verb;
समझा Verb;
समेट Verb;
सरक Verb;
सराह Verb;
साट Verb;
सिंक Verb;
सिंचवा Verb;
सिकुड़ Verb;
सिझ Verb;
सिलग Verb;
सिसक Verb;
सीझ Verb;
सुखा Verb;
सुड़क Verb;
सुनवा Verb;
सुलग Verb;
सुलवा Verb;
सुहला Verb;
सूज Verb;
सेंका Verb;
सोच Verb;
सोह Verb;
हँकला Verb;
हँपा Verb;
हँसवा Verb;
हंफवा Verb;
हकबका Verb;
हटवा Verb;
हड़प Verb;
हन Verb;
हरिया Verb;
हाँफ Verb;
हिंदुआ Verb;
हिन्दुआ Verb;
हिलवाना-डुलवा Verb;
हिलाना-डोला Verb;
हेंगा Verb;
हो Verb;
